src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Lule Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! ======================
!! # Sublexica for Noun
! ======================

!! ## Even-syllable stems
! -------------------

!! ### 2syll stems
! - - - - - -

LEXICON MUORRA !!= @CODE@ Standard even stems with cg (note Q1). OBS: Nouns with invisible 3>2 cg (as busºsa) go to this lexicon.
 :   MUORRAInfl ;
 :%> MUORRACmp  ;

!!€gt-norm:  # Even-syllable test
!!€ kártta:         kártta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kártajn:        kártta+N+Sg+Com


LEXICON MUORRAInfl
          :%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
          :%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
          :»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ; !muorasj, with err/ort muorrasj
          :»    DenominalAdjsV1      ; ! muoradibme -dibme adj caritive derivation
          :»X7  DenominalAdjsV2      ; !-lasj with weak grade and vowel changes, ájgálasj

 +Err/Orth:%> ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES2     ; ! Err/Orth "muorrav"

LEXICON TÁLLA !!= @CODE@ Same as MUORRA, but for words with º (extra length). Not in MUORRA because of other err/orths

 :%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
 :%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
 :»    DenominalNounsTÁLLA ; ! tállasj, also err/orth tálasj
 :»    DenominalAdjsV1      ; !-dibme adj caritive derivation
 :»X7  DenominalAdjsV2      ; !-lasj with weak grade and vowel changes, ájgálasj
 :%>   MUORRACmp            ;

+Err/Orth:%>Ø5        N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; !Err/orth Weak grade III-I, tálav
+Err/Orth:»Ø5       DenominalAdjsV2      ; !Err/orth tálalasj
+Err/Orth:»Ø5         DenominalAdjsV1_1    ; !err/orth táladibme                    

LEXICON ALMME !!= @CODE@ Same as MUORRA, but with special -LASJ derivation. For noun that have strong grade -lasj. "Almmelasj" instead of "almálasj" which is Err/Orth-taged..

 :%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
 :%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
 :»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 :»    DenominalAdjsV1      ; !-dibme adj caritive derivation
 :»    DenominalAdjsV2      ; ! -lasj, no WeG or vowel changes
 :%> MUORRACmp  ;
 
 +Err/Orth:»X7  DenominalAdjsV2      ; ! X7 makes weak grade and vowel changes: almálasj 
 +Err/Orth:»Q1  DenominalAdjsV2      ; ! Q1 makes weak grade without vowel changes: almelasj 


LEXICON NOADE !!= @CODE@ Even stem without cg. OBS: No nouns with invisible 3>2 cg (as busºsa) in this lexicon. OBS: Because of denominal nouns taking a weak grade stem, entries in grade 3 are given the gradation mark º in order to prevent alternation to weak grade. We should consider creating a separate denominal nouns lexicon for NOADE instead.

          :%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
          :%>Q4  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Q4=Stem vowel change e:i and o:u in front of j. Dipht. simpl. Like Q1 but strong grade.
          :%>    NOADECmp             ;
          :»     DenominalNounsNOADE  ;
          :»     DenominalAdjsV1_1    ; !-dibme adj caritive derivation
          :»Z2   DenominalAdjsV2      ; !-lasj Z2=vowel changes without WeG 
          
 +Err/Orth:»     DenominalAdjsV2      ; !err/Orth lasj without vowel changes, gives vuodolasj. 


!!€gt-norm: låda # Even-syllable test
!!€ låda:                 låda+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ lådas:               låda+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON KÁFFA !!= @CODE@ For even-syll words with cg cg III-I: káf'fa-káfav, jáf'fo-jáfo. No vowelchanges jet, need new twolc code.

                                              :%>          N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                                              :%>Z3        N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade III-I
                             +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:Z4sj        N-ODDCASE            ;
                             +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:Z4tj        OTH-ODDCASE          ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:Z4sj        R                    ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:Z4tja       R                    ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:Z4tjij      R                    ;
      +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:Z4tja»sj    K-CONS               ; !Dobbel diminutiv
             +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N:Z4tja»ttja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN         ;
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Use/NG:Z4tja»dtja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN         ;  !Gives káfatjadtjaj, barely not used
   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:Z4tja»sj    R                    ;
   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:Z4tja»ttja  R                    ;
   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:Z4tja»ttjaj R                    ;
                               +Der1+Der/Car+A:Z3          DIBME                ;
                               +Der1+Der/Car+A:Z4dis%>     ATTR                 ;
                                              :»Z4         DenominalAdjsV2      ; !-lasj with weak grade
                                    +Cmp/SgNom:            R                    ;
                                    +Cmp/SgGen:Z4          R                    ;
                                    +Cmp/PlGen:Z4j         R                    ;

                                     +Err/Orth:%>Q1        N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! For III-II (káf'fa-káffav)
                                     +Err/Orth:»           DenominalNounsMUORRA ; ! For III-II (káf'fa-káffav)
                                     +Err/Orth:»           DenominalAdjsV1      ; ! For III-II (káf'fa-káffav)
                                     +Err/Orth:»X7         DenominalAdjsV2      ; ! For III-II (káf'fa-káffav)

!!€gt-norm: káffa # Even-syllable test
!!€ káffa:                 káffa+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gáffa:                 káffa+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gáfas:                 káffa+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ káfas:                 káffa+N+Sg+Ela
